Illinois, session 104th, SB1610.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is 5amended by adding Section 5-735 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 5/5-735 new)7    Sec. 5-735. Fee waiver for formally incarcerated 8individuals. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all 9State agencies shall waive any fees assessed to a formerly 10incarcerated person for services provided by that State agency 11for a period of one year after the release of that person from 12a facility operated by the Department of Corrections, the 13Department of Juvenile Justice, or the Federal Bureau of 14Prisons.